District of Columbia statutes.
42-3131.16

Transmission of list by Mayor.

(a)

Semiannually, the Mayor shall transmit to the Office of Tax and Revenue a list of buildings:

(1)

Registered as vacant; provided, that for the purposes of this section and § 47-813(d-1)(5)(A-i)(i)(I)(aa), buildings for which the registration has been revoked shall also be deemed registered; and

(2)

For which a notice of final determination has been issued under §§ 42-3131.05 through 42-3131.16 and administrative appeals have been exhausted or expired.

(b)

The list shall be in the form and medium prescribed by the Office of Tax and Revenue.

Apr. 14, 1906, 34 Stat. 115, ch. 1626, § 16
as added Aug. 15, 2008, D.C. Law 17-216, § 3(i), 55 DCR 7500
Sept. 26, 2012, D.C. Law 19-171, § 102, 59 DCR 6190
This section is referenced in § 42-3131.06, § 47-813, and § 47-4654.
The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-171 substituted “§§ 42-3131.05 through 42-3131.16” for “this subchapter” in (a)(2).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(d) of Real Property Tax Reform Temporary Amendment Act of 2010 (D.C. Law 18-153, May 22, 2010, law notification 57 DCR 5381).
For temporary (225 day) addition, see § 3(i) of Nuisance Properties Abatement Reform and Real Property Classification Temporary Amendment Act of 2006 (D.C. Law 16-259, March 8, 2007, law notification 54 DCR 3044).
For temporary (225 day) addition, see § 3(i) of Nuisance Properties Abatement Reform and Real Property Classification Temporary Amendment Act of 2007 (D.C. Law 17-102, February 2, 2008, law notification 55 DCR 4254).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 3(i) of Nuisance Properties Abatement Reform and Real Property Classification Emergency Amendment Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-586, December 28, 2006, 54 DCR 353).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 3(i) of Nuisance Properties Abatement Reform and Real Property Classification Emergency Amendment Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-173, November 2, 2007, 54 DCR 11204).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 3(i) of Nuisance Properties Abatement Reform and Real Property Classification Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2008 (D.C. Act 17-436, July 16, 2008, 55 DCR 8272).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(d), of Real Property Tax Reform Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-313, February 22, 2010, 57 DCR 1645).
Section 5(a) of D.C. Law 17-216 provided that sections 2, 3, and 4(b) and (c) shall apply to real property tax years beginning after September 30, 2006.